Wyoming, session 2026, HB0034.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 9-3-402(a)(xviii) and (xxv) is
amended to read:
9-3-402. Definitions.
(a) As used in this article:
(xviii) "Law enforcement officer" or "officer"
means any member who is a county sheriff, deputy county
sheriff, municipal police officer, duly authorized
investigator of the Wyoming livestock board meeting the
specifications of W.S. 7-2-101(a)(iv)(E), duly authorized
personnel of the Wyoming gaming commission meeting the
specifications of W.S. 7-2-101(a)(iv)(P), investigator
employed by the Wyoming state board of outfitters and
professional guides meeting the specifications of W.S.
7-2-101(a)(iv)(J), Wyoming correctional officer, probation
and parole agent employed by the Wyoming department of
corrections, Wyoming law enforcement academy instructor,
full-time state park ranger, University of Wyoming campus
police officer, community college police officer, detention
officer, or dispatcher for law enforcement agencies or any
person employed on a full-time basis as a correctional
forestry crew supervisor, correctional crew supervisor or
correctional forestry crew manager by the Wyoming state
forestry division of the office of state lands and
investments or any other agency;
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0034
ENROLLED ACT NO. 3, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(xxv) "Firefighter member" means:
(A) Any employee of a Wyoming national
guard fire department crash and rescue unit employed on a
full-time basis for firefighting and rescue operations
within the department; and
(B) Any person employed full-time or
temporary full-time in a wildland firefighting occupation
by any state agency.
Section 2. There is appropriated four hundred eleven
thousand dollars ($411,000.00) from the general fund to the
office of state lands and investments for retirement
contributions made pursuant to this act. This appropriation
shall be for the period beginning July 1, 2026 and ending
June 30, 2028. This appropriation shall not be transferred
or expended for any other purpose and any unexpended,
unobligated funds remaining from this appropriation shall
revert as provided by law on June 30, 2028. It is the
intent of the legislature that this appropriation be
included in the standard budget for the office of state
lands and investments for the immediately succeeding fiscal
biennium.
Section 3.
(a) The Wyoming retirement board and the office of
state lands and investments shall promulgate all rules
necessary to implement this act.
(b) Coverage of persons employed on a full-time basis
as a correctional forestry crew supervisor, correctional
crew supervisor, correctional forestry crew manager or in a
2

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0034
ENROLLED ACT NO. 3, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
wildland firefighting occupation by the Wyoming state
forestry division of the office of state lands and
investments or any other state agency, as required by
section 1 of this act, shall commence on July 1, 2026,
unless those persons elect to continue participation in the
Wyoming Retirement Act as a general member. An election
shall be made by providing notice to the Wyoming retirement
board not later than April 30, 2026. Once an election is
made it shall not be rescinded. Service credit in any other
retirement plan administered by the Wyoming retirement
board, other than previous credit as a firefighter member
or law enforcement officer member, shall not be included as
service credit as a firefighter member or law enforcement
member under this act.
3

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0034
ENROLLED ACT NO. 3, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 4.
(a) Except as provided by subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2026.
(b) Sections 3 and 4 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
4